New York, session 2025-2026, S6893.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The legislature finds that feasibil- 2 ity issues related to the pace of technological advances, the capacity 3 of the state's power grid, and the impacts of weather and other route 4 conditions on zero-emission school buses (ZEBs) operated throughout the 5 state present significant challenges to school districts working to 6 transition their fleets in accordance with the department of education's 7 (SED) first transition deadline of July 1, 2027. For that reason, this 8 legislation addresses two separate concerns with current law. First, it 9 examines the feasibility of each district's transition process. Second, 10 for those districts deemed to have the most feasible paths to transi- 11 tion, the legislation directs SED, in conjunction with the New York 12 state energy research and development authority (NYSERDA) and the 13 department of health (DOH), to assess a defined group of district char- 14 acteristics to determine which districts shall receive prioritized 15 transportation and building aid for the purchase of additional trans- 16 mission capacity and/or ZEBs and the design and construction of related 17 infrastructure. 18 With respect to an individual district's ability to comply with the 19 existing mandate, the legislation directs SED to require all school 20 districts to complete a baseline transition feasibility analysis and to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09808-09-5 S. 6893--B 2 1 repeat that process every five years. If a district's analysis deter- 2 mines that more than 50% of the district's regular bus routes are not 3 deemed feasible for service by zero-emission school buses, then the 4 district may maintain its existing fleet status quo until its next tran- 5 sition feasibility analysis. On the other hand, if a district's analy- 6 sis determines that more than 50% of the district's regular bus routes 7 are serviceable by zero-emission buses, then the district must comply 8 with the existing transition timeline for the percentage of regular 9 routes deemed feasible and may maintain the status quo for the 10 district's remaining non-feasible regular routes until the district 11 completes its next transition feasibility analysis. The outer deadline 12 for districts with substantial feasibility challenges to transition 13 their fleets will be 2040. 14 Despite the multi-faceted transition challenges faced by some 15 districts, e.g., average low temperatures, topography and route distance 16 vary widely across the state and substantially impact manufacturer's 17 specifications and ZEB reliability, voters tend to focus exclusively on 18 the variable of cost. Unfortunately, while there have been steady price 19 declines in consumer electric vehicles since the transition deadlines 20 were set in 2022, ZEBs still cost two to four times more than tradi- 21 tional internal combustion engine (ICE) buses, and the average cost of a 22 ZEB has increased by 8.7%. In addition, three years ago experts forecast 23 parity between the total cost of ownership for ZEBs and ICEs to occur by 24 2027, but now the forecast has extended to 2030 or beyond. Because the 25 high cost for adding transmission and charging infrastructure to accom- 26 modate ZEBs falls predominantly on individual school districts, public 27 support for the transition frequently wanes when voters must choose 28 between spending limited budget dollars on educational expenses or for 29 reducing local tailpipe emissions. There is no real debate for many 30 voters in such a scenario, particularly for rural school districts that 31 have low pupil populations and lots of fresh air, but few resources and 32 high educational needs. 33 To promote a more effective transition with a greater impact sooner, 34 the legislature finds that the state must initially concentrate the 35 funding allocated to the transition on school districts with more than 36 two thousand pupils. Within such group of school districts, the state 37 shall then assess which districts, based on their county's childhood 38 asthma ER visit rate, their transition feasibility analysis, SED's 39 need/resource capacity index rating and per pupil spending, shall be 40 prioritized to receive transportation and building aid relief for the 41 purchase of additional transmission capacity and/or ZEBs and the design 42 and construction of related infrastructure. Data indicates that, to 43 date, only thirty-one of New York state's seven hundred thirty-one 44 school districts have sought voter approval to purchase ZEBs. Voters in 45 eight of the thirty-one districts voted "no". 46 Upon review of all thirty-one school districts which voted, certain 47 patterns have emerged: 48 1. Districts with fewer than 2000 pupils voted "no" to ZEBs more 49 frequently. Of the eight school districts which voted "no" to ZEBs, six 50 have fewer than 2000 pupils and five of those six districts are rural 51 districts. 52 2. Rural districts with a "high" need/resource capacity index voted 53 "no" more frequently. Of the five rural school districts that voted 54 "no", SED categorizes four of those districts as "high" on its 55 need/resource capacity index, with the fifth district categorized as 56 "average". S. 6893--B 3 1 3. DOH does not quantify childhood asthma ER visit rates as "high" 2 concern in the counties of most rural districts. Four of the five rural 3 school districts which voted "no" to ZEBs (with the exception of 4 Edwards-Knox Central School District in St. Lawrence County) are located 5 in counties of "low" concern for childhood asthma ER visit rates. (Per 6 DOH, St. Lawrence County is of "moderate" concern.) Of the six school 7 districts with less than 2000 pupils that voted "no", Mexico Central 8 School - located east of SUNY Oswego along Lake Ontario - was the only 9 suburban school district, however, it is located in a county with "low" 10 concern for childhood asthma ER visit rates. 11 Further patterns emerge when one contrasts the "no" votes with the 12 "yes" votes. 13 4. Districts with 2000 or more pupils voted "yes" to ZEBs more 14 frequently. Fourteen of the sixteen school districts with 2000 or more 15 pupils voted "yes" to ZEBs. In contrast, only nine of the fifteen school 16 districts with less than 2000 pupils voted "yes". When examining the two 17 districts with 2000 or more pupils which voted "no" - Churchville-Chili 18 Central School District, a suburban district southwest of the City of 19 Rochester, and Baldwinsville Central School District, a suburban 20 district northwest of the city of Syracuse - the votes initially appear 21 to be outliers, as each district has large pupil populations (of 3,688 22 and 5,444, respectively) and is located in a county with "moderate" to 23 "high" concern for childhood asthma ER visit rates. However, as noted 24 below, another characteristic of each of those two districts undoubtedly 25 plays a pivotal role in their voting results. 26 5. Districts with an "average" need/resource capacity index rating and 27 per pupil spending below $19,500 voted "no" to ZEBs. Each of the four- 28 teen districts with more than 2000 pupils which voted "yes" to ZEBs have 29 "low" or "average" need/resource capacity index ratings and spend more 30 than $19,500 per pupil. In contrast, the two large districts which voted 31 "no" - Churchville-Chili and Baldwinsville - each with "average" 32 need/resource capacity index ratings and high childhood asthma ER visit 33 rates, both spend less than $19,500 per pupil. Moreover, unlike small 34 districts which voted "yes" but which have "average" need/resource 35 capacity index ratings with per pupil spending exceeding $19,500, Bemus 36 Point central school district, a small district with an "average" 37 need/resource capacity index rating and less than $19,500 per pupil 38 spending, voted "no" to ZEBs. 39 While most school district administrators support the transition to 40 ZEBs, the practical mechanics of the transition are challenging and 41 costly. Administrators and voters alike feel the limitations of their 42 local school district budgets, and as demonstrated by ZEB votes across 43 the state, when put "between a rock and a hard place", voters will 44 consistently prioritize educational spending over transportation spend- 45 ing, even when the community's asthma health risks are high. Large 46 districts with low per pupil spending need financial assistance to help 47 them accomplish the transition. The state can achieve the largest 48 advances in public health in the shortest amount of time if it initially 49 prioritizes allocated funds to districts with 2000 or more pupils, no 50 more than an "average" need/resource capacity index rating, and per 51 pupil spending of less than $19,500. As a result of such policy priori- 52 ties, large districts with demonstrated feasibility challenges and small 53 districts with less than 2000 pupils will be given additional time to 54 complete their transitions in accordance with their current transition 55 feasibility analysis. S. 6893--B 4 1 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 2 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. For the purposes of this section "zero-emission school bus" shall 5 mean a school bus that: is propelled by an electric motor and associated 6 power electronics which provide acceleration torque to the drive wheels 7 during normal vehicle operations and draws electricity from a hydrogen 8 fuel cell or battery; or otherwise operates without direct emission of 9 atmospheric pollutants, provided however that, notwithstanding the fore- 10 going, for the purposes of this section such term shall include a hybrid 11 battery electric bus with a second source of energy for propulsion. 12 § 3. Section 3638 of the education law is amended by adding two new 13 subdivisions 1-a and 1-b to read as follows: 14 1-a. The department shall require every school district to complete a 15 transition feasibility analysis before the end of the next succeeding 16 full school year, or within fifteen months, as of the effective date of 17 this subdivision, whichever is sooner, and every five years thereafter, 18 to determine which if any regular routes can feasibly be serviced by 19 zero-emission school buses, provided that existing feasibility studies 20 completed within the two years preceding the adoption of this subdivi- 21 sion shall meet the requirements of this subdivision. The analysis shall 22 assess each district's transportation needs, current bus routes and 23 alternative routes based on distance, topography, bridge and road 24 infrastructure, average low temperatures, and a minimum end-of-route 25 charge requirement of no less than twenty percent, consider the suffi- 26 ciency of the school district's electric transmission capacity and 27 infrastructure and assess the availability of and accessibility to state 28 and/or federal funding for the purchase of zero-emission school buses 29 and construction of associated infrastructure. For purposes of categor- 30 izing schools pursuant to this section, the pupil population of a school 31 district shall be the number most recently reported to the department or 32 the number used in the district's current transition feasibility analy- 33 sis, whichever is lower, and such number shall be deemed to remain 34 unchanged until updated in the school district's next succeeding transi- 35 tion feasibility analysis. 36 1-b. Within six months of the effective date of this subdivision and 37 annually thereafter, the department, in consultation with the New York 38 state energy research and development authority and department of 39 health, shall develop a list of school districts with two thousand or 40 more pupils and rank their need for transportation and building aid for 41 the purchase of zero-emission buses and transmission capacity and the 42 design and construction of related infrastructure based on an assessment 43 of each such district's current transition feasibility analysis, average 44 per pupil spending, the most recent department of health data regarding 45 the rate of emergency room visits for asthma per ten thousand persons 46 aged zero to seventeen in the county in which such school district is 47 located, and the needs/resource capacity group to which the commissioner 48 has assigned such school district. To maximize the effectiveness of the 49 state's limited pool of aid funding for the transition to zero-emission 50 school buses, the commissioner shall prioritize the award of such allo- 51 cated transportation and building aid to the high need school districts 52 whose transition will likely have the highest positive health impact on 53 the highest number of students. 54 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 55 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 56 amended to read as follows: S. 6893--B 5 1 2. (a) [No later than July first, two thousand twenty-seven, every] 2 Every school district with two thousand or more pupils shall, by no 3 later than July first, two thousand thirty, abide by the findings of the 4 district's current transition feasibility analysis, completed in accord- 5 ance with subdivision one-a of this section, as set forth in this subdi- 6 vision. If the findings of a school district's transition feasibility 7 analysis indicate that: 8 (i) [only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses when purchasing 9 or leasing new buses; 10 (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 11 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the 12 school district must only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses 13 when purchasing or leasing new school buses; and 14 (iii)] fifty percent or more of all regular routes are not deemed 15 feasible for service by zero-emission school buses, then the school 16 district may continue to operate, maintain or contract for non-zero-em- 17 ission school buses and receive transportation aid for non-zero-emission 18 school buses purchased or leased to make required transportation runs; 19 or 20 (ii) less than fifty percent of all regular routes are not deemed 21 feasible for service by zero-emission school buses, then the school 22 district (A) shall operate, maintain or contract for zero-emission 23 school buses and receive transportation aid for zero-emission school 24 buses purchased or leased for such regular routes as are deemed feasibly 25 serviceable by a zero-emission school bus or for an equivalent percent- 26 age of regular routes deemed feasible for service by such buses and (B) 27 may operate, maintain or contract for non-zero-emission school buses for 28 the remaining regular routes and receive transportation aid for non- 29 zero-emission school buses purchased or leased to make required trans- 30 portation runs for such remaining regular routes. 31 (a-1) With respect to any zero-emission school buses operated or main- 32 tained by a school district in accordance with the findings of the 33 district's current transition feasibility analysis as set forth in para- 34 graph (a) of this subdivision, such school district shall include 35 requirements in any procurement for the manufacturing or retrofitting of 36 a zero-emission school bus and charging or fueling infrastructure that 37 the components and parts used or supplied in the performance of the 38 contract or any subcontract thereto shall be produced or made in whole 39 or substantial part in the United States, its territories or possessions 40 and that final assembly of the zero-emission school bus and charging or 41 fueling infrastructure shall occur in the United States, its territories 42 or possessions. 43 (a-2) Every school district with less than two thousand pupils shall, 44 by no later than July first, two thousand thirty-seven: 45 (i) only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses when purchasing 46 or leasing new buses; 47 (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 48 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the 49 school district must only purchase or lease zero-emission school buses 50 when purchasing or leasing new school buses; and 51 (iii) include requirements in any procurement for the manufacturing or 52 retrofitting of a zero-emission school bus and charging or fueling 53 infrastructure that the components and parts used or supplied in the 54 performance of the contract or any subcontract thereto shall be produced 55 or made in whole or substantial part in the United States, its territo- 56 ries or possessions and that final assembly of the zero-emission school S. 6893--B 6 1 bus and charging or fueling infrastructure shall occur in the United 2 States, its territories or possessions. 3 (b) The commissioner, in consultation with the New York state energy 4 research and development authority and office of general services, may 5 waive the contracting requirements set forth in [subparagraph (iii) of] 6 paragraph [(a)] (a-1) of this subdivision if the commissioner determines 7 that the requirements would not be in the public interest, would result 8 in unreasonable costs, or that obtaining such zero-emission school buses 9 and charging or fueling infrastructure components and parts in the 10 United States would increase the cost of a school district's contract 11 for zero-emission school buses and charging or fueling infrastructure by 12 an unreasonable amount, or such zero-emission school busses and charging 13 or fueling infrastructure components and parts cannot be produced, made, 14 or assembled in the United States in sufficient and reasonably available 15 quantities or of satisfactory quality. Such determination must be made 16 on an annual basis no later than December thirty-first, after providing 17 notice and an opportunity for public comment, and be made publicly 18 available, in writing, on the department's website with a detailed 19 explanation of the findings leading to such determination. If the 20 commissioner has issued determinations for three consecutive years that 21 no such waiver is warranted pursuant to this paragraph, then the commis- 22 sioner shall no longer be required to provide the annual determinations 23 required by this paragraph. 24 (c) Any school district which encumbers funds and places an order for 25 a zero-emission school bus prior to July first, two thousand thirty, but 26 which does not receive delivery of such bus before such date, shall be 27 deemed in compliance with the provisions of this subdivision. 28 (d) For the purpose of this subdivision, "regular routes" are defined 29 as daily runs to and from a student's home, child care or bus stop to 30 the district school. Routes to transport students off the primary 31 school campus for boards of cooperative educational services (BOCES) 32 programs, special education placements at a distance greater than thirty 33 miles from the district school and to transport homeless students and 34 students to and from extracurricular activities shall be deemed "non 35 regular" routes and exempted from any zero-emission school bus require- 36 ment pursuant to this chapter. 37 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 38 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 39 amended to read as follows: 40 3. [No later than July first, two thousand thirty-five, every] (a) 41 Every school district with two thousand or more pupils shall, by no 42 later than July first, two thousand thirty-seven: 43 [(a)] (i) only operate and maintain zero-emission school buses; and 44 [(b)] (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school trans- 45 portation services that any contractors providing transportation 46 services for the school district must only operate zero-emission school 47 buses when providing such transportation services to the school 48 district. 49 (b) Every school district with less than two thousand pupils shall, by 50 no later than July first, two thousand forty: 51 (i) only operate and maintain zero-emission school buses; and 52 (ii) include requirements in any procurement for school transportation 53 services that any contractors providing transportation services for the 54 school district must only operate zero-emission school buses when 55 providing such transportation services to the school district. S. 6893--B 7 1 § 6. Subdivision 4 of section 3638 of the education law, as added by 2 section 1 of subpart A of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 4. A school district may apply to the commissioner, and the department 5 may grant a one-time extension of up to twenty-four months to comply 6 with the requirements of subdivision [two] three of this section. The 7 commissioner shall consider a school district's effort to meet the 8 requirements of subdivision [two] three of this section when granting an 9 extension, including but not limited to, procurement efforts made by the 10 school district, applications for state or federal funds, changes needed 11 to school district operations to meet the requirements of this section, 12 employee training, and receipt of technical assistance, if any. Upon a 13 school district receiving an extension, the New York state energy 14 research and development authority, in consultation with the department, 15 shall provide any additional technical assistance necessary to the 16 district to meet the requirements of subdivision [two] three of this 17 section. 18 § 7. Subdivision 1 of section 3623-a of the education law is amended 19 by adding a new paragraph a-1 to read as follows: 20 a-1. Zero-emission bus transition feasibility analysis, conducted 21 pursuant to subdivision one-a of section thirty-six hundred thirty-eight 22 of this article; 23 § 8. Paragraph e of subdivision 1 of section 3623-a of the education 24 law is amended by adding two new subparagraphs 1-a and 7-a to read as 25 follows: 26 (1-a) salary for a zero-emission transportation transition planner; 27 (7-a) costs incurred to transport an out-of-service zero-emission bus 28 for storage and repairs; 29 § 9. Subdivision 3 of section 35 of part A of chapter 56 of the laws 30 of 2023 amending the education law relating to contracts for excellence, 31 is amended to read as follows: 32 3. Section nineteen of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed 33 June 30, [2036] 2041; and 34 § 10. This act shall take effect immediately.